North Carolina statutes. Chapter 41. Estates.
Article 1. Survivorship Rights and Future Interests.
§ 41-11.2.
Sale of standing timber; life estate.

If real property with standing timber is subject to a life estate, the life tenant or owner of the remainder or reversionary interest may initiate a proceeding under Chapter 46A of the General Statutes to sell the timber, separate from the real property, pursuant to

G.S. 46A-80

.

History.

2020-23, s. 14.

§ 41-12.
Sales or mortgages of contingent remainders validated.

In all cases where property has been conveyed by deed, or devised by will, upon contingent remainder, executory devise, or other limitations, where a judgment of a superior court has been rendered authorizing the sale or mortgaging, including execution of deeds of trust, of such property discharged of such contingent remainder, executory devise, or other limitations in actions or special proceedings where all persons in being who would have taken such property if the contingency had then happened were parties, such judgment shall be valid and binding upon the parties thereto and upon all other persons not then in being or whose estates had not been vested: Provided, that nothing herein contained shall be construed to impair or destroy any vested right or estate.

History.

1905, c. 93; Rev., s. 1591; C.S., s. 1745; 1923, c. 64; 1935, c. 36.

Cross References.

As to revocation of deeds of future interests made to persons not in esse, see

G.S. 39-6

.

Legal Periodicals.

As to the 1923 amendment, see 1 N.C.L. Rev. 285 (1923).

For article, “The Rule Against Perpetuities in North Carolina,” see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 727 (1979).

For article, “Requiem for the Rule in Shelley’s Case,” see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 681 (1989).

§ 41-13.
Freeholders in petition for special taxes defined.

In all cases where a petition by a specific number of freeholders is required as a condition precedent to ordering an election to provide for the assessment or levy of taxes upon realty, all residents of legal age owning realty for life or longer term, irrespective of sex, shall be deemed freeholders within the meaning of such requirement.

History.

1915, c. 22; C.S., s. 1746.

§ 41-14.

Reserved for future codification purposes.